North Carolina statutes. Chapter 48. Adoptions.
Article 3. Adoption of Minors.
§ 48-3-601.
Persons whose consent to adoption is required.

Unless consent is not required under

G.S. 48-3-603

, a petition to adopt a minor may be granted only if consent to the adoption has been executed by:

The minor to be adopted if 12 or more years of age;

In a direct placement, by:

The mother of the minor;

Any man who may or may not be the biological father of the minor but who:

Is or was married to the mother of the minor if the minor was born during the marriage or within 280 days after the marriage is terminated or the parties have separated pursuant to a written separation agreement or an order of separation entered under Chapters 50 or 50B of the General Statutes or a similar order of separation entered by a court in another jurisdiction;

Attempted to marry the mother of the minor before the minor’s birth, by a marriage solemnized in apparent compliance with law, although the attempted marriage is or could be declared invalid, and the minor is born during the attempted marriage, or within 280 days after the attempted marriage is terminated by annulment, declaration of invalidity, divorce, or, in the absence of a judicial proceeding, by the cessation of cohabitation;

Before the filing of the petition, has legitimated the minor under the law of any state;

Before the earlier of the filing of the petition or the date of a hearing under

G.S. 48-2-206

, has acknowledged his paternity of the minor and

Is obligated to support the minor under written agreement or by court order;

Has provided, in accordance with his financial means, reasonable and consistent payments for the support of the biological mother during or after the term of pregnancy, or the support of the minor, or both, which may include the payment of medical expenses, living expenses, or other tangible means of support, and has regularly visited or communicated, or attempted to visit or communicate with the biological mother during or after the term of pregnancy, or with the minor, or with both; or

After the minor’s birth but before the minor’s placement for adoption or the mother’s relinquishment, has married or attempted to marry the mother of the minor by a marriage solemnized in apparent compliance with law, although the attempted marriage is or could be declared invalid; or

Before the filing of the petition, has received the minor into his home and openly held out the minor as his biological child; or

Is the adoptive father of the minor; and

A guardian of the minor; and

(3)

In an agency placement by:

a.

The agency that placed the minor for adoption; and

b.

Each individual described in subdivision (2) of this section who has not relinquished the minor pursuant to Part 7 of Article 3 of this Chapter.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1953, c. 906; 1957, c. 90; c. 778, ss. 3-5; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 534, s.1; c. 911, ss. 6, 7; c. 982; 1971, c. 1093, s. 13; c. 1185, s. 17; 1973, c. 1354, s. 5; 1975, c. 321, s. 1; c. 702, ss. 1-3; c. 714; 1977, c. 879, ss. 2, 3, 5; 1979, c. 107, s. 7; 2nd Sess., c. 1088, s. 1; 1983, cc. 30, 292; c. 454, ss. 2, 6; 1985, c. 758, ss. 5-11; 1987, c. 371, s. 1; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-215, s. 16.

Legal Periodicals.

For 1997 legislative survey, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 459 (1998).

For note, “Closing the Window of Opportunity: The Limited Rights of Putative Fathers Under

G.S. 48-3-601

and In re Byrd,” see 23 Campbell L. Rev. 305 (2001).

For casenote, “The Established Standard for Fathers Who Have Acknowledged Paternity and Who Are Seeking Custody of Their Illegitimate Child(ren): Rosero v. Blake,

357 N.C. 193

(2003),” see 26 N.C. Cent. L.J. 116 (2003).

For note, “In re S.D.W.: A Step in the Wrong Direction for Unmarried Fathers’ Parental Rights,” see 7 Charlotte L. Rev. 217 (2016).

For article, “Preserving Your Right to Parent: The Supreme Court of North Carolina Addresses Unmarried Fathers’ Due Process Rights in In Re Adoption of S.D.W.,” see 94 N.C.L. Rev. 723 (2016).

For comment, “N.C. Gen. Stat. § 48-3-601 and N.C. Gen. Stat. § 7B-1111: A Putative Father’s Right to Be a Father,” see 41 Campbell L. Rev. 201 (2019).

§ 48-3-602.
Consent of incompetent parents.

If a parent as described in

G.S. 48-3-601

has been adjudicated incompetent, then the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for that parent and, unless the child already has a guardian, a guardian ad litem for the child to make a full investigation as to whether the adoption should proceed. The investigation shall include an evaluation of the parent’s current condition and any reasonable likelihood that the parent will be restored to competency, the relationship between the child and the incompetent parent, alternatives to adoption, and any other relevant fact or circumstance. If the court determines after a hearing on the matter that it will be in the best interest of the child for the adoption to proceed, the court shall order the guardian ad litem of the parent to execute for that parent a consent as provided in this Part or a relinquishment as provided in Part 7 of this Article.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1953, c. 906; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 911, s. 7; c. 982; 1975, c. 702, ss. 1-3; 1977, c. 879, s. 5; 1985, c. 758, ss. 10, 11; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-215, s. 11(d); 2012-16, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-16, s. 6, effective October 1, 2012, substituted “execute for that parent a consent as provided in this Part or a relinquishment as provided in Part 7 of this Article” for “execute a consent for that parent” in the last sentence. For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 48-3-603.
Persons whose consent is not required.

Consent to an adoption of a minor is not required of a person or entity whose consent is not required under

G.S. 48-3-601

, or any of the following:

An individual whose parental rights and duties have been terminated under Article 11 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes or by a court of competent jurisdiction in another state.

A man described in

G.S. 48-3-601

(2), other than an adoptive father, if (i) the man has been judicially determined not to be the father of the minor to be adopted, or (ii) another man has been judicially determined to be the father of the minor to be adopted.

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-215, s. 11(a).

An individual who has relinquished parental rights or guardianship powers, including the right to consent to adoption, to an agency pursuant to Part 7 of this Article.

A man who is not married to the minor’s birth mother and who, after the conception of the minor, has executed a notarized statement denying paternity or disclaiming any interest in the minor.

A deceased parent or the personal representative of a deceased parent’s estate.

An individual listed in G.S. 48-3-601 who has not executed a consent or a relinquishment and who fails to respond to a notice of the adoption proceeding within 30 days after the service of the notice or, if service is by publication, 40 days from the first publication of the notice.

An individual notified under

G.S. 48-2-206

who does not respond in a timely manner or whose consent is not required as determined by the court.

(See editor’s note) An individual whose actions resulted in a conviction under

G.S. 14-27.21

,

G.S. 14-27.22

,

G.S. 14-27.23

, or

G.S. 14-27.24

and the conception of the minor to be adopted.

The court may issue an order dispensing with the consent of the following:

A guardian or an agency that placed the minor upon a finding that the consent is being withheld contrary to the best interest of the minor.

A minor 12 or more years of age upon a finding that it is not in the best interest of the minor to require the consent.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1957, c. 90; c. 778, ss. 3, 4; 1969, c. 534, s. 1; 1971, c. 1185, s. 17; 1975, c. 321, s. 1; c. 714; 1977, c. 879, ss. 2, 3; 1979, c. 107, s. 7; 2nd Sess., c. 1088, s. 1; 1983, c. 292; 1985, c. 758, ss. 5-9; 1987, c. 371, s. 1; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-215, ss. 11(a), 17; 1998-202, s. 13(o); 2004-128, s. 9; 2013-236, s. 7; 2015-54, s. 8; 2015-181, s. 34.

§ 48-3-604.
Execution of consent: timing.

A man whose consent is required under

G.S. 48-3-601

may execute a consent to adoption either before or after the child is born.

The mother of a minor child may execute a consent to adoption at any time after the child is born but not sooner.

A guardian of a minor to be adopted may execute a consent to adoption at any time.

An agency licensed by the Department or a county department of social services in this State that places a minor for adoption shall execute its consent no later than 30 days after being served with notice of the proceeding for adoption.

A minor to be adopted who is 12 years of age or older may execute a consent at any time.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-3-605.
Execution of consent: procedures.

A consent executed by a parent or guardian or by a minor to be adopted who is 12 years of age or older must conform substantially to the requirements in

G.S. 48-3-606

and must be signed and acknowledged under oath before an individual authorized to administer oaths or take acknowledgments.

A parent who has not reached the age of 18 years shall have legal capacity to give consent to adoption and to release that parent’s rights in a child, and shall be as fully bound as if the parent had attained 18 years of age.

An individual before whom a consent is signed and acknowledged under subsection (a) of this section shall certify in writing that to the best of the individual’s knowledge or belief, the parent, guardian, or minor to be adopted executing the consent has met each of the following:

Read, or had read to him or her, and understood the consent.

Signed the consent voluntarily.

Been given an original or a copy of his or her fully executed consent.

Been advised that counseling services may be available through county departments of social services or licensed child-placing agencies.

Been advised of the right to seek the advice of legal counsel before executing the consent.

A consent by an agency must be executed by the executive head or another authorized employee and must be signed and acknowledged under oath in the presence of an individual authorized to administer oaths or take acknowledgments.

A consent signed in another state or in another country in accord with the procedure of that state or country shall not be invalid solely because of failure to comply with the formalities set out in this Chapter.

A consent to the adoption of an Indian child, as that term is defined in the Indian Child Welfare Act, 25 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq., must meet the requirements of that Act.

The office of the clerk of superior court, the district court, and the superior court shall each be a court of competent jurisdiction for the purposes of (i) judicial proceedings for accepting voluntary consents to adoption under 25 U.S.C. § 1913, (ii) making determinations as to whether there is good cause to deviate from placement preferences under 25 U.S.C. § 1915(a), or (iii) judicial proceedings for voluntary consent to adoption in conformance with the laws of any state.

In addition to other methods of identification permitted by Chapter 10B of the General Statutes or other applicable law, a parent or adoptee who has not reached the age of 18 years may be identified to an individual authorized to administer oaths or take acknowledgments by an affidavit of an adult relative of the minor, a teacher, a social worker employed by an agency or a county department of social services, a licensed professional social worker, a health service provider, or, if none of the foregoing persons to whom the minor does not object is available, an adult who has known the minor for more than two years.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1971, c. 1231, s. 1; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 2013-236, s. 8; 2015-54, s. 9; 2015-264, s. 44(a); 2018-68, s. 1.1; 2019-172, s. 7(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-236, s. 8, effective July 3, 2013, added “has met each of the following” at the end of the introductory paragraph of subsection (c); rewrote subdivision (c)(3), which formerly read “Received or was offered a copy of the consent; and”; and made minor stylistic and punctuation changes throughout subsection (c).

Session Laws 2015-54, s. 9, effective June 4, 2015, added the last sentence in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 44(a), effective October 1, 2015, added subsection (g).

Session Laws 2018-68, s. 1.1, effective October 1, 2018, deleted the last sentence in subsection (b); and added subsection (h).

Session Laws 2019-172, s. 7(a), effective October 1, 2019, added subdivision (c)(5).

§ 48-3-606.
Content of consent; mandatory provisions.

A consent required from a minor to be adopted, a parent, or a guardian under

G.S. 48-3-601

must be in writing and state each of the following:

The date and place of the execution of the consent.

The name, date of birth, and permanent address, if any, and if none, the current mailing address, of the individual executing the consent.

The date of birth or the expected delivery date, the sex, and the name of the minor to be adopted, if known. A consent to adoption of a newborn minor may give the minor’s name as “Baby [Last Name of Biological Mother]” or a similar designation.

That the individual executing the document is voluntarily consenting to the transfer of legal and physical custody to, and the adoption of the minor to be adopted by, the identified prospective adoptive parent.

The name of a person and an address where any notice of revocation may be sent.

That the individual executing the document understands that after the consent is signed and acknowledged in accord with the procedures set forth in

G.S. 48-3-605

, it may be revoked in accord with

G.S. 48-3-608

, but that it is otherwise final and irrevocable and may not be withdrawn or set aside except under a circumstance set forth in

G.S. 48-3-609

.

That the consent shall be valid and binding and is not affected by any oral or separate written agreement between the individual executing the consent and the adoptive parent.

That the individual executing the consent has not received or been promised any money or anything of value for the consent, and has not received or been promised any money or anything of value in relation to the adoption of the child except for lawful payments that are itemized on a schedule attached to the consent.

That the individual executing the consent understands that when the adoption is final, all rights and obligations of the adoptee’s former parents or guardian with respect to the adoptee will be extinguished, and every aspect of the legal relationship between the adoptee and the former parent or guardian will be terminated.

The name and address of the court, if known, in which the petition for adoption has been or will be filed.

That the individual executing the consent waives notice of any proceeding for adoption.

If the individual executing the document is the minor to be adopted or the person placing the minor for adoption, a statement that the adoption shall be by a specific named adoptive parent.

If the individual executing the document is the person placing the minor for adoption, that the individual executing the consent has provided the prospective adoptive parent, or the prospective adoptive parent’s attorney, with the written document required by

G.S. 48-3-205

.

That the person executing the consent has:

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-236, s. 9, effective July 3, 2013.

Been advised that counseling services may be available through county departments of social services or licensed child-placing agencies; and

Been advised of the right to seek the advice of legal counsel.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2; 2013-236, s. 9; 2015-54, s. 10; 2018-68, s. 2.1; 2019-172, s. 7(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-236, s. 9, effective July 3, 2013, added “each of the following” at the end of the introductory paragraph; deleted subdivision (14)a.; and made minor stylistic and punctuation changes throughout the section.

Session Laws 2015-54, s. 10, effective June 4, 2015, inserted “, if any, and if none, the current mailing address” in subdivision (2).

Session Laws 2018-68, s. 2.1, effective October 1, 2018, added the last sentence in subdivision (3).

Session Laws 2019-172, s. 7(b), effective October 1, 2019, substituted “seek the advice of” for “employ independent” in sub-subdivision (14)c.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Winning the Battle or Losing the War?
The Implications of Boseman v. Jarrell on the Same-Sex Adoption Debate in North Carolina,” see 34 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 98 (2011).

§ 48-3-607.
Consequences of consent.

A consent executed pursuant to

G.S. 48-3-605

and

G.S. 48-3-606

may be revoked as provided in

G.S. 48-3-608

. A consent is otherwise final and irrevocable except under a circumstance set forth in

G.S. 48-3-609

.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the consent of a parent, guardian, or agency that placed a minor for adoption pursuant to Part 2 of this Article vests legal and physical custody of the minor in the prospective adoptive parent and empowers this individual to petition the court to adopt the minor.

Any other parental right and duty of a parent who executed a consent is not terminated until either the decree of adoption becomes final or the relationship of parent and child is otherwise terminated, whichever comes first. Until termination, the minor remains the child of a parent who executed a consent for purposes of any inheritance, succession, insurance, arrears of child support, and other benefit or claim that the minor may have from, through, or against the parent.

A prospective adoptive parent with whom a minor has been placed in an independent adoption and who has filed a petition for adoption of the minor may, after the time within which the consenting parent or guardian may revoke the consent has expired, apply ex parte to a clerk of superior court for an order finding that the child has been placed with the petitioner and confirming that the petitioner has legal and physical custody of the minor for the purposes of obtaining a certified copy of the child’s birth certificate, a Social Security number, or federal and State benefits for the minor.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1957, c. 778, s. 6; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 982; 1983, cc. 83, 688; 1985, c. 758, s. 12; 1987, c. 541, s. 1; 1991, c. 667, s. 1; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 2018-68, s. 3.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-68, s. 3.1, effective October 1, 2018, added subsection (d).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Surrogate Parenthood: Finding a North Carolina Solution,” see 18 N.C. Cent. L.J. 1 (1989).

§ 48-3-608.
Revocation of consent.

A consent to the adoption of any infant who is in utero or any minor may be revoked within seven days following the day on which it is executed, inclusive of weekends and holidays. If the final day of the revocation period falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday when North Carolina courthouses are closed for transactions, then the revocation period extends to the next business day. The individual who gave the consent may revoke by giving written notice to the person specified in the consent. Notice may be given by personal delivery, overnight delivery service, or registered or certified mail, return receipt requested. If notice is given by mail, notice is deemed complete when it is deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the person to whom consent was given at the address specified in the consent. If notice is given by overnight delivery service, notice is deemed complete on the date it is deposited with the service as shown by the receipt from the service, with delivery charges paid by the sender, addressed to the person to whom consent was given at the address specified in the consent.

In a direct placement, if:

A preplacement assessment is required, and

Placement occurs before the preplacement assessment is given to the parent or guardian who is placing the minor,

then that individual’s time under subsection (a) of this section to revoke any consent previously given shall be either five business days after the date the individual receives the preplacement assessment prepared substantially in conformance with the requirements of

G.S. 48-3-303

, or the remainder of the time provided in subsection (a) of this section, whichever is longer. The date of receipt is the earlier of the date of actual receipt or the date established pursuant to

G.S. 48-3-307

.

If a person who has physical custody places the minor with the prospective adoptive parent and thereafter revokes a consent pursuant to this section, the prospective adoptive parent shall, immediately upon request, return the minor to that person. The revocation restores the right to physical custody and any right to legal custody to the person who placed the minor and divests the prospective adoptive parent of any right to legal or physical custody and any further responsibility for the care and support of the minor. In any subsequent proceeding, the court shall award reasonable attorneys’ fees to the person who revoked if the prospective adoptive parent fails upon request to return the minor.

If a person other than a person described in subsection (c) of this section revokes a consent pursuant to this section and this person’s consent is required, the adoption cannot proceed until another consent is obtained or the person’s parental rights are terminated. The person who revoked consent is not thereby entitled to physical custody of the minor. If the minor whose consent is required revokes consent, the county department of social services shall be notified for appropriate action.

A second consent to adoption by the same adoptive parents is irrevocable.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1957, c. 778, s. 6; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 982; 1983, cc. 83, 688; 1985, c. 758, s. 12; 1987, c. 541, s. 1; 1991, c. 667, s. 1; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-215, s. 8(a); 2001-150, s. 10; 2009-185, s. 5; 2012-16, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-185, s. 5, effective June 26, 2009, substituted “Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday when North Carolina courthouses are closed for transactions” for “weekend or North Carolina or federal holiday” in the second sentence of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2012-16, s. 7, effective October 1, 2012, inserted “prepared substantially in conformance with the requirements of

G.S. 48-3-303

” near the middle of the last paragraph of subsection (b). For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 48-3-609.
Challenges to validity of consent.

A consent shall be void if:

Before the entry of the adoption decree, the individual who executed the consent establishes by clear and convincing evidence that it was obtained by fraud or duress;

The prospective adoptive parent and the individual who executed the consent mutually agree in writing to set it aside;

The petition to adopt is voluntarily dismissed with prejudice; or

The court dismisses the petition to adopt and no appeal has been taken, or the dismissal has been affirmed on appeal and all appeals have been exhausted.

If the consent of an individual who previously had legal and physical custody of a minor becomes void under subsection (a) of this section and no grounds exist under

G.S. 48-3-603

for dispensing with this individual’s consent, the court shall order the return of the minor to the custody of that individual and shall dismiss any pending adoption proceeding. If the court has reasonable cause to believe that the return will be detrimental to the minor, the court shall not order the return of the minor but shall notify the county department of social services for appropriate action.

If the consent of an individual who did not previously have physical custody of a minor becomes void under subsection (a) of this section and no ground exists under

G.S. 48-3-603

for dispensing with this individual’s consent, the court shall dismiss any pending proceeding for adoption. If return of the minor is not ordered under subsection (b) of this section, the court shall notify the county department of social services for appropriate action.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-3-610.
Collateral agreements.

If a person executing a consent and the prospective adoptive parent or parents enter into an agreement regarding visitation, communication, support, and any other rights and duties with respect to the minor, this agreement shall not be a condition precedent to the consent itself, failure to perform shall not invalidate a consent already given, and the agreement itself shall not be enforceable.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-3-701.
Individuals who may relinquish minor; timing.

A parent or guardian may relinquish all parental rights or guardianship powers, including the right to consent to adoption, to an agency. If both parents are married to each other and living together, both parents must act jointly in relinquishing a child to an agency.

The mother of a minor child may execute a relinquishment at any time after the child is born but not sooner. A man whose consent is required under

G.S. 48-3-601

may execute a relinquishment either before or after the child is born.

A guardian may execute a relinquishment at any time.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1953, c. 906; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 911, s. 7; c. 982; 1975, c. 702, ss. 1-3; 1977, c. 879, s. 5; 1985, c. 758, ss. 10, 11; 1995, c. 457, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to relinquishment to a department of social services, see

G.S. 7B-909.1

.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Winning the Battle or Losing the War?
The Implications of Boseman v. Jarrell on the Same-Sex Adoption Debate in North Carolina,” see 34 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 98 (2011).

§ 48-3-702.
Procedures for relinquishment.

A relinquishment executed by a parent or guardian must conform substantially to the requirements in this Part and must be signed and acknowledged under oath before an individual authorized to administer oaths or take acknowledgments.

The provisions of G.S. 48-3-605(b), (e), (f), and (g) also apply to a relinquishment executed under this Part.

(b1)

An individual before whom a relinquishment is signed and acknowledged under subsection (a) of this section shall certify in writing that to the best of the individual’s knowledge or belief, the parent, guardian, or minor to be adopted executing the relinquishment has met each of the following:

Read, or had read to him or her, and understood the relinquishment.

Signed the relinquishment voluntarily.

Been given an original or copy of his or her fully executed relinquishment.

Been advised that counseling services are available through the agency to which the relinquishment is given.

Been advised of the right to seek the advice of legal counsel before executing the relinquishment.

An agency that accepts a relinquishment shall furnish each parent or guardian who signs the relinquishment a letter or other writing indicating the agency’s willingness to accept that person’s relinquishment.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-215, s. 7(a); 2013-236, s. 10; 2015-264, s. 44(b); 2019-172, s. 7(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-236, s. 10, effective July 3, 2013, deleted “(c)” following “48-3-605(b)” in subsection (b); and added subsection (b1).

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 44(b), effective October 1, 2015, substituted “(e), (f), and (g)” for “(e) and (f)” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2019-172, s. 7(c), effective October 1, 2019, added subdivision (b1)(5).

§ 48-3-703.
Content of relinquishment; mandatory provisions.

A relinquishment executed by a parent or guardian under

G.S. 48-3-701

must be in writing and state the following:

The date and place of the execution of the relinquishment.

The name, date of birth, and permanent address, if any, and if none, the current mailing address, of the individual executing the relinquishment.

The date of birth or the expected delivery date, the sex, and the name of the minor, if known. A relinquishment of a newborn minor may give the minor’s name as “Baby [Last Name of Biological Mother]” or similar designation.

The name and address of the agency to which the minor is being relinquished.

That the individual voluntarily consents to the permanent transfer of legal and physical custody of the minor to the agency for the purposes of adoption, and

The placement of the minor for adoption with a prospective adoptive parent selected by the agency; or

The placement of the minor for adoption with a prospective adoptive parent selected by the agency and agreed upon by the individual executing the relinquishment.

That the individual executing the relinquishment understands that after the relinquishment is signed and acknowledged in the manner provided in

G.S. 48-3-702

, it may be revoked in accord with

G.S. 48-3-706

but that it is otherwise final and irrevocable except under the circumstances set forth in

G.S. 48-3-707

.

That the relinquishment shall be valid and binding and shall not be affected by any oral or separate written agreement between the individual executing the consent and the agency.

That the individual executing the relinquishment understands that when the adoption is final, all rights and duties of the individual executing the relinquishment with respect to the minor will be extinguished and all other aspects of the legal relationship between the minor child and the parent will be terminated.

That the individual executing the relinquishment has not received or been promised any money or anything of value for the relinquishment of the minor, and has not received or been promised any money or anything of value in relation to the relinquishment or the adoption of the minor except for lawful payments that are itemized on a schedule attached to the relinquishment.

That the individual executing the relinquishment waives notice of any proceeding for adoption.

That the individual executing the relinquishment has provided the agency with the written document required by

G.S. 48-3-205

, or that the individual has provided the agency with signed releases that will permit the agency to compile the information required by

G.S. 48-3-205

.

That the individual executing the relinquishment has:

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-236, s. 9, effective July 3, 2013.

Been advised that counseling services are available through the agency to which the relinquishment is given; and

Been advised of the right to seek the advice of legal counsel.

Reserved.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2; 2013-236, s. 11; 2015-54, s. 11; 2018-68, s. 2.2; 2019-172, s. 7(d).

§ 48-3-704.
Content of relinquishment; optional provisions.

In addition to the mandatory provisions listed in

G.S. 48-3-703

, a relinquishment may also state that the relinquishment may be revoked upon notice by the agency that an adoption by a specific prospective adoptive parent, named or described in the relinquishment is not completed. In this event the parent’s time to revoke a relinquishment is 10 days, inclusive of weekends and holidays, from the date the parent receives such notice from the agency. The revocation shall be in writing and delivered in a manner specified in G.S. 48-3-706(a) for revocation of relinquishments. An agency, which after the exercise of due diligence cannot personally locate the parent entitled to this notice, may deposit a copy of the notice in the United States mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the address of the parent given in the relinquishment, and the date of receipt by the parent is deemed to be the date of delivery or last attempted delivery. If a parent does not revoke the relinquishment in the time and manner provided in this section, the relinquishment is deemed a general relinquishment to the agency, and the agency may place the child for adoption with a prospective adoptive parent selected by the agency.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-215, s. 19.1(a); 2001-208, s. 15; 2001-487, s. 101.

As Related to Best Interests. —

Assuming mother executed a relinquishment of her parental rights to the child expressly to facilitate his adoption, adoption statutes permitted her to revoke her relinquishment for various reasons; the child would be needlessly denied permanence and the trial court’s recognition of potential hindrances to the child’s plan of adoption did not reflect either a misapprehension of the law or an abuse of discretion in the trial court’s contemplation of the child’s best interests.
In re M.R.J., 2021-NCSC-112,

378 N.C. 648

, 862 S.E.2d 639, 2021- NCSC-112, 2021

N.C. LEXIS 927

(2021).

§ 48-3-705.
Consequences of relinquishment.

A relinquishment executed pursuant to

G.S. 48-3-702

through

G.S. 48-3-704

may be revoked as provided in

G.S. 48-3-706

and is otherwise final and irrevocable except under a circumstance set forth in

G.S. 48-3-707

.

Upon execution, a relinquishment by a parent or guardian entitled under

G.S. 48-3-201

to place a minor for adoption:

Vests legal and physical custody of the minor in the agency; and

Empowers the agency to place the minor for adoption with a prospective adoptive parent selected in the manner specified in the relinquishment.

A relinquishment terminates:

Any right and duty of the individual who executed the relinquishment with respect to the legal and physical custody of the minor.

The right to consent to the minor’s adoption.

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-215, s. 19.1(b).

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, parental rights and duties of a parent who executed a relinquishment are not terminated until the decree of adoption becomes final or the parental relationship is otherwise legally terminated, whichever occurs first. Until termination the minor remains the child of a parent who executed a relinquishment for purposes of any inheritance, succession, insurance, arrears of child support, and other benefit or claim that the minor may have from, through, or against the parent.

An agency or county department of social services to whom a minor has been relinquished may, after the time within which the relinquishing parent or guardian may revoke the relinquishment has expired, apply ex parte to a clerk of superior court for an order finding that the child has been relinquished to the agency and confirming that the agency or county department of social services has legal custody of the minor for the purposes of obtaining a certified copy of the child’s birth certificate, a Social Security number, or federal and State benefits for the minor.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1953, c. 906; 1957, c. 778, s. 6; 1961, c. 186; 1967, c. 926, s. 1; 1969, c. 911, ss. 7, 9; c. 982; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1975, c. 702, ss. 1-3; 1977, c. 879, s. 5; 1983, c. 454, ss. 4, 7; cc. 83, 688; 1985, c. 758, ss. 10-12; 1987, c. 541, s. 1; 1991, c. 667, s. 1; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-215, s. 19.1(b); 2018-68, s. 3.2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-68, s. 3.2, effective October 1, 2018, added subsection (e).

§ 48-3-706.
Revocation of relinquishments.

A relinquishment of any infant who is in utero or any minor may be revoked within seven days following the day on which it is executed by the infant or minor’s parent or guardian, inclusive of weekends and holidays. If the final day of the period falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday when North Carolina courthouses are closed for transactions, then the revocation period extends to the next business day. The individual who gave the relinquishment may revoke by giving written notice to the agency to which the relinquishment was given. Notice may be given by personal delivery, overnight delivery service, or registered or certified mail, return receipt requested. If notice is given by mail, notice is deemed complete when it is deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the agency at the agency’s address as given in the relinquishment. If notice is given by overnight delivery service, notice is deemed complete on the date it is deposited with the service as shown by the receipt from the service, with delivery charges paid by the sender, addressed to the agency at the agency’s address as given in the relinquishment.

If a person who has physical custody relinquishes a minor and thereafter revokes a relinquishment pursuant to this section, the agency shall upon request return the minor to that person. The revocation restores the right to physical custody and any right to legal custody to the person who relinquished the minor and divests the agency of any right to legal or physical custody and any further responsibility for the care and support of the minor. In any subsequent proceeding, the court may award the person who revoked reasonable attorneys’ fees from a prospective adoptive parent with whom the minor was placed who refuses to return the minor and from the agency if the agency fails to cooperate in securing the minor’s return.

If a person other than a person described in subsection (b) of this section revokes a relinquishment pursuant to this section and this person’s consent is required, the agency may not give consent for the adoption and the adoption cannot proceed until another relinquishment or a consent is obtained or parental rights are terminated. The person who revoked the relinquishment is not thereby entitled to physical custody of the minor.

A second relinquishment for placement with the same adoptive parent selected by the agency and agreed upon by the person executing the relinquishment, or a second general relinquishment for placement by the agency with any adoptive parent selected by the agency, is irrevocable.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1957, c. 778, s. 6; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 982; 1983, cc. 83, 688; 1985, c. 758, s. 12; 1987, c. 541, s. 1; 1991, c. 667, s. 1; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-456, s. 56.2(a); 2001-150, s. 11; 2009-185, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-185, s. 6, effective June 26, 2009, in subsection (a), inserted “by the infant or minor’s parent or guardian” in the first sentence, and substituted “Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday when North Carolina courthouses are closed for transactions” for “weekend or North Carolina or federal holiday” in the second sentence.